California statutes. Public Resources Code
The provisions of Section 3207 as to termination and cancellation shall also apply to all bonds which have been heretofore filed with the supervisor as then provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 794.)
-------------------------------------------

3210.

The owner or operator of any well shall keep, or cause to be kept, a careful and accurate log, core record, and history of the drilling of the well.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3211.

The log shall show the character and depth of the formation passed through or encountered in the drilling of the well. The log shall show completely the amounts, kinds, and size of casing used, the depth at which oil-bearing or gas-bearing strata are encountered, the depth and character of the strata, and whether all water overlying and underlying the oil-bearing or gas-bearing strata was successfully and permanently shut off so as to prevent the percolation or penetration of water into the oil-bearing or gas-bearing strata; and whether strata bearing water that might be suitable for irrigation or domestic purposes are properly protected from the infiltration or addition of detrimental substances from the well.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 278, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

3212.

The core record shall show the depth, character, and fluid content of cores obtained, so far as determined.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3213.

(a) The history shall show the location and amount of sidetracked casings, tools, or other material, the depth and quantity of cement in cement plugs, the shots of dynamite or other explosives, all acid treatment data of any amount, and the results of production and other tests during drilling operations. All data on well stimulation treatments pursuant to Section 3160 shall be recorded in the history.

(b) Acid treatment data
 reported in a well history where the acid treatment occurred before December 31, 2021, and that complies with the requirements of Section 1777.4 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as it read on December 31, 2021, satisfies the well history acid treatment data reporting requirement in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 727, Sec. 6.   (SB 406)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3214.

The log shall be kept in the local office of the owner or operator, and, together with the tour reports of the owner or operator, shall be subject, during business hours, to the inspection of the supervisor, the district deputy, or the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1073.)
-------------------------------------------

3215.

(a) Within 60 days after the date of cessation of drilling, rework, well stimulation treatment, or abandonment operations, or the date of suspension of operations, the operator shall file with the district deputy, in a form approved by the supervisor, true copies of the log, core record, and history of work performed, and, if made, true and reproducible copies of all electrical, physical, or chemical logs, tests, or surveys. Upon a showing of hardship, the supervisor may extend the time within which to comply with this section for a period not to exceed 60 additional days.

(b) The supervisor shall include information or electronic links to information provided pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 3160 on existing publicly accessible maps on the division’s
 Internet Web site, and make the information available such that well stimulation treatment and related information are associated with each specific well. If data is reported on an Internet Web site not maintained by the division pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 3160, the division shall provide electronic links to that Internet Web site. The public shall be able to search and sort the hydraulic well stimulation and related information by at least the following criteria:

(1) Geographic area.

(2) Additive.

(3) Chemical constituent.

(4) Chemical Abstract Service number.

(5) Time period.

(6) Operator.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before
 July 30 of each year, the supervisor shall, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, prepare and transmit to the Legislature a comprehensive report on well stimulation treatments in the exploration and production of oil and gas resources in California. The report shall include aggregated data of all of the information required to be reported pursuant to Section 3160 reported by the district, county, and operator. The report also shall include relevant additional information, as necessary, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Aggregated data detailing the disposition of any produced water from wells that have undergone well stimulation treatments.

(2) Aggregated data describing the formations where wells have received well stimulation treatments including the range of safety factors used and fracture zone
 lengths.

(3) The number of emergency responses to a spill or release associated with a well stimulation treatment.

(4) Aggregated data detailing the number of times trade secret information was not provided to the public, by county and by each company, in the preceding year.

(5) Data detailing the loss of well and well casing integrity in the preceding year for wells that have undergone well stimulation treatment. For comparative purposes, data detailing the loss of well and well casing integrity in the preceding year for all wells shall also be provided. The cause of each well and well casing failure, if known, shall also be provided.

(6) The number of spot check inspections conducted pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 3160, including the number of
 inspections where the composition of well stimulation fluids were verified and the results of those inspections.

(7) The number of well stimulation treatments witnessed by the division.

(8) The number of enforcement actions associated with well stimulation treatments, including, but not limited to, notices of deficiency, notices of violation, civil or criminal enforcement actions, and any penalties assessed.

(d) The report shall be made publicly available and an electronic version shall be available on the division’s Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 56.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3216.

The owner or operator of any well, or his local agent, shall file with the supervisor a copy of the log, history, and core record, or any portion thereof, at any time after the commencement of the work of drilling any well upon written request of the supervisor, or the district deputy. The request shall be signed by the supervisor, or the district deputy, and served either personally, or by mailing a copy of the request, by registered mail, to the last known post office address of the owner or operator, or his agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1073.)
-------------------------------------------

3219.

Any person engaged in operating any oil or gas well wherein high pressure gas is known to exist, and any person drilling for oil or gas in any district where the pressure of oil or gas is unknown shall equip the well with casings of sufficient strength, and with such other safety devices as may be necessary, in accordance with methods approved by the supervisor, and shall use every effort and endeavor effectually to prevent blowouts, explosions, and fires.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3219.5.

(a) On or before July 1, 2001, the Department of Conservation shall report to the Governor and the Legislature on options for ensuring the existence of blowout insurance for persons engaged in drilling or redrilling exploratory oil and gas wells in areas where abnormally high or unknown subsurface pressure gradients exist. The report shall consider all of the following:

(1) Types of insurance policies, which include control of well policies and policies that cover personal injury and property damage resulting from a catastrophic well blowout occurrence.

(2) Methods of setting insurance policy amounts.

(3) Forms of insurance, including third-party insurance, provision of an operator’s proof of ability to respond in damages, a combination thereof, or other options.

(4) Areas of the state where abnormally high pressure gradients exist, or where insufficient data exists to draw conclusions regarding the subsurface pressure gradient.

(5) Any other factors the department deems appropriate to include in the report.

(b) The Department of Conservation shall consult with representatives of the oil industry and insurers in developing the report’s recommendations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 737, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3220.

The owner or operator of any well on lands producing or reasonably presumed to contain oil or gas shall properly case it with water-tight and adequate casing, in accordance with methods approved by the supervisor or the district deputy, and shall, under his direction, shut off all water overlying and underlying oil-bearing or gas-bearing strata and prevent any water from penetrating such strata. The owner or operator shall also use every effort and endeavor to prevent damage to life, health, property, and natural resources; to shut out detrimental substances from strata containing water suitable for irrigation or domestic purposes and from surface water suitable for such purposes; and to prevent the infiltration of detrimental substances into such strata and into such surface water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 795.)
-------------------------------------------

3222.

The owner or operator of any well shall, at the request of the supervisor, demonstrate that water from any well is not penetrating oil-bearing or gas-bearing strata or that detrimental substances are not infiltrating into underground or surface water suitable for irrigation or domestic purposes. The owner or operator shall give the district deputy adequate notice of the time at which he will demonstrate the test for shutoff in the well.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 795.)
-------------------------------------------

3223.

The district deputy or an inspector designated by the supervisor may be present at the test for shutoff. If the test is personally witnessed by the district deputy or an inspector at the site of the well, such district deputy or inspector shall make a report in writing of the result to the supervisor. A duplicate of the report shall be delivered to the owner.

If any test is unsatisfactory to the supervisor, he shall so notify the owner or operator and shall within five days after the completion of the test, order any additional work and tests necessary to properly shut off the well. In the order the supervisor shall designate a day upon which the owner or operator shall again test for shutoff, which day may, upon the application of the owner or operator, be changed from time to time at the discretion of the district deputy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 795.)
-------------------------------------------

3224.

The supervisor shall order those tests or remedial work as in the supervisor’s judgment are necessary to prevent damage to life, health, property, and natural resources; to protect oil and gas deposits from damage by underground water; or to prevent the escape of water into underground formations, or to prevent the infiltration of detrimental substances into underground or surface water suitable for irrigation or domestic purposes, to the best interests of the neighboring property owners and the public. In addition to any cessation requirements or other limitations contained in applicable regulations or conditions of approval, an order to undertake remedial work under this section may include an order to cease and desist
 specified activities that threaten to damage life, health, property, or natural resources, including waters suitable for irrigation or domestic purposes, or that violate the requirements of this chapter or a regulation implementing this chapter. The order shall be in writing, signed by the supervisor. It shall be served upon the owner of the well, or the owner’s local agent, either personally or by mailing a copy of the order to the post office address given at the time the local agent is designated. If a local agent has not been designated, the order shall be served by mailing a copy to the last known post office address of the owner, or if the owner is unknown, by posting a copy in a conspicuous place upon the property, and publishing it once a week for two successive weeks in some newspaper of general circulation throughout the county in which the well is located. The order shall specify the
 conditions sought to be remedied and the work necessary to protect the deposits from damage from underground water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 337, Sec. 2.   (AB 631)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3224.5.

(a) After making a determination, based upon a site inspection, that a well poses a risk to life, health, property, or natural resources, the supervisor may order an operator, owner, or property owner to secure a site, based on a site inspection, if both of the following conditions apply to that site:

(1) The well does not comply with the regulations implementing this chapter.

(2) The well poses a risk to life, health, property, or natural resources.

(b) (1) The order to secure the well shall require the posting of the
 site with signs. The order shall also require that the well be enclosed with a fence.

(2) If fencing is ordered, the fence shall be maintained at the well to prevent unauthorized persons from gaining access to the well.

(3) The signs shall be maintained and shall meet all of the following requirements:

(A) Be bilingual, appropriate to the local area.

(B) Have lettering that is legible from a distance of at least 25 feet.

(C) Read: “Caution: Hazardous Well, Unauthorized Persons Keep Out” and shall have the name and telephone number of the division contact that ordered the posting.

(D) Be visible from the surrounding area and posted at each route of entry into the site, including those routes that are likely to be used by unauthorized persons, at access roads leading to the well, and facing navigable waterways where appropriate.

(E) Be of a material able to withstand the elements.

(c) An order of the supervisor to secure the site under subdivision (a) may be appealed by the owner of the property pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 3350), except that in the case of an emergency a stay of the supervisor’s order shall not accompany the appeal.

(d) Within five days after service of an order pursuant to this section, or, if there has
 been an appeal from the order to the director, within five days after service of the decision of the director, or, if a review has been taken of the order of the director, within five days after affirmance of the order, the operator, owner, or property owner shall complete the work ordered. If the work is not completed within that time, the supervisor may appoint necessary agents to enter the premises and perform the work. If the supervisor determines that an emergency exists, the supervisor may secure and post the site as necessary to protect life, health, property, or natural resources pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3226. If the division undertakes work to secure a site pursuant to this section, an accurate account of the expenditures shall be kept and any amount expended shall constitute a lien pursuant to Section 3423 against real or personal property of the operator, owner, or property
 owner ordered to do the work. The division’s accounting of actual costs to perform work ordered shall be served by personal service or certified mail. For purposes of Section 3420, charges pursuant to this section for actual costs to perform work ordered are delinquent if not paid within 30 days after service of the accounting of costs.

(e) The remedies and penalties specified in this section are in addition to, and do not affect, any other remedies, enforcement actions, requirements, or penalties otherwise authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 337, Sec. 3.   (AB 631)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3225.

(a) An order of the supervisor or a district deputy issued pursuant to this chapter shall provide a clear and concise recitation of the acts or omissions with which the operator is charged. The order shall state all penalties and requirements imposed on the operator in connection with the acts or omissions charged and the order shall provide references to the provisions of this code and the regulations that support the imposition of the penalties and requirements.

(b) An order requiring an operator to cease and desist operations pursuant to Section 3270.3 shall specify the operations that the operator is required to cease and desist and shall provide a detailed explanation of the
 steps that the operator shall take before the supervisor will permit the operations to resume.

(c) An order of the supervisor or a district deputy shall be in writing and shall be served on the operator by personal service or by certified mail.

(d) When the supervisor or a district deputy issues a written order concerning an operation, an appeal may be made from the order pursuant to the procedures contained in Article 6 (commencing with Section 3350). The order shall inform the operator of its right to appeal the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

3226.

(a) Within 30 days after service of an order pursuant to Sections 3224 and 3225, or Section 3237, or if there has been an appeal from the order to the director, within 30 days after service of the decision of the director, or if a review has been taken of the order of the director, within 10 days after affirmance of the order, the owner or operator shall commence in good faith the work ordered and continue it until completion. If the work has not been commenced and continued to completion, the supervisor may appoint necessary agents to enter the premises and perform the work. An accurate account of the expenditures shall be kept. Any amount so expended shall constitute a lien against real or personal property of the operator pursuant to the provisions of Section 3423. Before performing such
 work, the division may impose a lien against the real or personal property of the operator pursuant to Section 3423 in an amount equal to an estimate of the cost of the work based on a bid from a contractor or previous costs to perform comparable work.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of Section 3224, 3225, or 3237, if the supervisor determines that an emergency exists, the supervisor may order or undertake the actions the supervisor deems necessary to protect life, health, property, or natural resources.

(c) The division’s accounting of actual or estimated costs to perform work ordered shall be served upon the operator by personal service or certified mail. For purposes of Section 3420, charges to an operator pursuant to this section for actual or estimated costs to perform work ordered are delinquent if not paid within 30 days after service of the accounting of
 costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 707, Sec. 3.   (AB 896)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3226.3.

The division shall annually provide to the State Water Resources Control Board and the California regional water quality control boards an inventory of all unlined oil and gas field sumps.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 561, Sec. 1.   (SB 1281)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3227.

(a) The owner of any well shall file with the supervisor, on or before the last day of each month, for the last preceding calendar month, a statement, in the form designated by the supervisor, showing all of the following:

(1) The amount of oil and gas produced from each well during the period indicated, together with the gravity of the oil, the amount of water produced from each well, estimated in accordance with methods approved by the supervisor, and the number of days during which fluid was produced from each well.

(2) The number of wells drilling, producing, injecting, or idle, that are owned or operated by the
 person.

(3) What disposition was made of the gas produced from each field, including the names of persons, if any, to whom the gas was delivered, and any other information regarding the gas and its disposition that the supervisor may require.

(4) What disposition was made of water produced from each field and the amount of fluid or gas injected into each well used for enhanced recovery, underground storage of hydrocarbons, or wastewater disposal, and any other information regarding those wells that the supervisor may require.

(5) The source of water, and volume of any water, reported in paragraph (4), including the water used to generate or make up the composition of any injected fluid or gas. Water volumes shall be reported
 by water source if more than one water source is used. The volume of untreated water suitable for domestic or irrigation purposes shall be reported. Commingled water shall be
 proportionally assigned to individual wells, as appropriate.

(6) The treatment of water and the use of treated or recycled water in oil and gas field activities, including, but not limited to, exploration, development, and production.

(7) (A) The specific disposition of all water used in or generated by oil and gas field activities, including water produced from each well reported pursuant to paragraph (1). Water volumes shall be reported by disposition method if more than one disposition method is used. Commingled water shall be proportionally assigned to individual wells, as appropriate.

(B) This information shall also include the temporary onsite storage of water, as or if appropriate, and the
 ultimate specific use, disposal method or method of recycling, or reuse of this water.

(b) Any operator that produces oil by the application of mining or other unconventional techniques shall file a report with the supervisor, on or before March 1 of each year, showing the amount of oil produced by those techniques in the preceding calendar year.

(c) (1) Upon request and making a satisfactory showing therefor, a longer filing period may be established by the supervisor for any particular owner or operator.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the owner of any well shall file with the supervisor, on a quarterly basis, a statement containing the information required to be reported pursuant to paragraphs (5), (6),
 and (7) of subdivision (a) in the form designated by the supervisor.

(d) (1) The division shall use a standardized form or format to facilitate reporting required pursuant to this section.

(2) On or before July 1, 2023, all operators shall provide to the division the information required pursuant to this section electronically. 

(e) The division shall use noncustom software, as feasible, to implement online reporting by the operator of the information required pursuant to paragraphs (5), (6), and (7) of subdivision (a). This information may be reported separately from other information required to be reported pursuant to this section.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Source of water” or “water source” means any of the following:

(A) The well or wells, if commingled, from which the water was produced or extracted.

(B) The water supplier, if purchased or obtained from a supplier.

(C) The point of diversion of surface water.

(2) “Specific disposition of all water” means the identification of the ultimate specific use, disposal method or method of recycling, or reuse of the water. This includes, but is not limited to, the identification of any treatment or recycling method
 used, injection of the water into specific injection or disposal well or wells, if commingled, discharge of the water to surface water or sumps, and sale or transfer of the water to a named entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 727, Sec. 7.   (SB 406)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3227.5.

The supervisor shall compile from statements filed pursuant to Section 3227 and publish monthly statistics, within 90 days of the end of each calendar month, showing the amount of oil and gas produced in the state by field and pool, together with the number of wells producing or idle, all separately stated as to field and pool, with any other information that the supervisor deems proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 741, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

3227.6.

As used in Sections 3227 and 3227.5, the following terms have the following meaning:

(a) “Field” means the same general surface area which is underlain, or reasonably appears to be underlain, by one or more pools.

(b) “Pool” means an underground reservoir containing, or appearing at the time of determination to contain, a common accumulation of crude petroleum oil or natural gas or both. Each zone of a general structure which is separated from any other zone in the structure is a separate pool.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 741, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

3228.

Before abandoning any well in accordance with methods approved by the supervisor or the district deputy, and under his or her direction, the owner or operator shall isolate all oil-bearing or gas-bearing strata encountered in the well and shall use every effort and endeavor to protect any underground or surface water suitable for irrigation or domestic purposes from the infiltration or addition of any detrimental substances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 278, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

3229.

Before commencing any work to abandon a well, the owner or operator shall file with the supervisor or the district deputy a written notice of intention to abandon the well. Abandonment shall not proceed until approval is given by the supervisor or the district deputy. If the supervisor or the district deputy does not give the owner or operator a written response to the notice of intention within 10 working days, the proposed abandonment shall be deemed to have been approved and the notice of intention shall for the purposes of this chapter be deemed a written report of the supervisor. If abandonment operations have not commenced within 24 months of receipt of the notice of intention, the notice of intention shall be deemed canceled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 772, Sec. 3.   (AB 1328)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3230.

The notice of intention to abandon shall contain the following information:

(a) The total depth of the well to be abandoned.

(b) The complete casing record of the well, including plugs.

(c) Such other pertinent data as the supervisor may require on printed forms supplied by the division or on other forms acceptable to the supervisor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 743.)
-------------------------------------------

3232.

The supervisor or the district deputy shall, within 10 days after the receipt of a written report of abandonment, furnish the owner or operator with a written final approval of abandonment, or a written disapproval of abandonment, setting forth the conditions upon which the disapproval is based.

Failure to abandon in accordance with the approved method of abandonment, or failure to notify the supervisor or the district deputy of any test required by the final approval of abandonment to be witnessed by the supervisor, the district deputy, or his or her inspector, or failure to furnish the supervisor or the district deputy, at his or her request, with any information regarding the condition of the well, shall constitute sufficient grounds for disapproval of the abandonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1077, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

3233.

(a) The division may develop field rules which establish volumetric thresholds for emergency reporting by the operator of oil discharges to land associated with onshore drilling, exploration, or production operations, where the oil discharges, because of the circumstances established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), cannot pass into or threaten the waters of the state. The division may not adopt field rules under this section, unless the State Water Resources Control Board and the Department of Fish and Game first concur with the volumetric reporting thresholds contained in the proposed field rules. Subchapter 1 (commencing with Section 1710) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations shall apply to
 the adoption and implementation of field rules authorized by this section.

(b) The authority granted to the division pursuant to subdivision (a) shall apply solely to oil fields located in the San Joaquin Valley, as designated by the division. The division shall adopt the field rules not later than January 1, 1998.

(c) For purposes of implementing this section, the division, the State Water Resources Control Board, and the Department of Fish and Game shall enter into an agreement that defines the process for establishing both of the following:

(1) The circumstances, such as engineered containment, under which oil discharges cannot pass into or threaten the waters of this state.

(2) The volumetric reporting thresholds that are applicable under the circumstances established pursuant to paragraph (1).

(d) In no case shall a reporting threshold established in the field rules, where the oil discharge cannot pass into or threaten the waters of this state, be less than one barrel (42 gallons), unless otherwise established by federal law or regulation. Until field rules are adopted, emergency reporting of oil discharges shall continue as required by existing statute and regulations.

(e) An operator who discharges oil in amounts less than the volumetric thresholds adopted by the division pursuant to this section is exempt from all applicable state and local reporting requirements. Discharges of oil in amounts equal to, or greater than, the volumetric
 thresholds adopted by the division pursuant to this section shall be immediately reported to the Office of Emergency Services which shall inform the division and other local or state agencies as required by Section 8589.7 of the Government Code. Reporting to the Office of Emergency Services shall be deemed to be in compliance with all applicable state and local reporting requirements.

(f) Oil discharges below the reporting thresholds established in the field rules shall be exempt from the emergency notification or reporting requirements, and any penalties provided for nonreporting, established under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 13260 of the Water Code, subdivisions (a), (c), and (e) of Section 13272 of the Water Code, Section 25507 of the Health and Safety Code, Sections 8670.25.5 and 51018 of the Government Code, and
 subdivision (h) of Section 1722 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations. Oil discharge reporting requirements under Section 51018 of the Government Code shall be applicable if a spill involves a fire or explosion.

(g) This section shall not affect existing reporting or notification requirements under federal law.

(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve any party of any responsibility established by statute, regulation, or order, to clean up or remediate any oil discharge, whether reportable or exempt pursuant to this section.

(i) Reporting provided pursuant to this section is not intended to prohibit any department or agency from seeking and obtaining any supplemental postreporting information
 to which the department or agency might otherwise be entitled.

(j) For purposes of this section, “oil” means naturally occurring crude oil.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 479.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

3234.

(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all the well records, including production reports, of any owner or operator that are filed pursuant to this chapter are public records for purposes of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(2) Those records are public records when filed with the division unless the owner or operator requests, in writing, that the division maintain the well records of onshore exploratory wells or offshore exploratory wells as confidential information. The records of other wells may be maintained as confidential
 information if, based upon information in a written request of the owner or operator, the supervisor determines there are extenuating circumstances. For onshore wells, the confidential period shall not exceed two years from the cessation of drilling operations as defined in subdivision (e). For offshore wells, the confidential period shall not exceed five years from the cessation of drilling operations as specified in subdivision (e).

(3) Well records maintained as confidential information by the division shall be open to inspection by those persons who are authorized by the owner or operator in writing. Confidential status shall not apply to state officers charged with regulating well operations, the director, or as provided in subdivision (c).

(4) On receipt by the supervisor
 of a written request documenting extenuating circumstances relating to a particular well, including a well on an expired or terminated lease, the supervisor may extend the period of confidentiality for six months. For onshore wells, the total period of confidentiality, including all extensions, shall not exceed four years from the cessation of drilling operations as specified in subdivision (e), and for offshore wells the total period of confidentiality, including all extensions, shall not exceed seven years from the cessation of drilling operations as specified in subdivision (e), unless the director approves a longer period after a 30-day public notice and comment period. The director shall initiate and conduct a public hearing on receipt of a written complaint.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a) regarding the
 period of confidentiality, the well records for onshore and offshore wells shall become public records when the supervisor is notified that the lease has expired or terminated.

(c) Production reports filed pursuant to Section 3227 shall be open to inspection by the State Board of Equalization or its duly appointed representatives when making a survey pursuant to Section 1815 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or when valuing state-assessed property pursuant to Section 755 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and by the assessor of the county in which a well referred to in Section 3227 is located.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “well records” does not include either experimental logs and tests or interpretive data not generally available to all operators, as defined by the supervisor by
 regulation.

(e) The cessation of drilling operations occurs on the date of removal of drilling machinery from the well site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 368.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

3235.

(a) The supervisor may upon their own initiative or shall upon receipt of a written complaint from a person owning land, residing, or operating wells within a radius of one mile of any well or group of wells complained against make an investigation of the well or wells involved. The supervisor shall make a written report and order, stating the work required to repair the damage complained of, or stating that no work is required.

(b) A copy of the order shall be delivered to the complainant, or if more than one, to each complainant, and, if the supervisor orders the damage repaired, a copy of the order shall be delivered to each of the owners,
 operators, or agents having in charge the well or wells upon which the work is to be done.

(c) The order shall contain a statement of the conditions sought to be remedied or repaired and a statement of the work required by the supervisor to repair the condition.

(d) Service shall be made by mailing copies to the persons required under this section at the post office address given.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 727, Sec. 8.   (SB 406)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3236.

(a) An owner or operator, or employee thereof, who refuses to permit the supervisor or the district deputy, or the district deputy’s inspector, to inspect a well, or who willfully hinders or delays the enforcement of this chapter, and every person, whether as principal, agent, servant, employee, or otherwise, who violates, fails, neglects, or refuses to comply with this chapter, or who fails, neglects, or refuses to furnish any report or record required pursuant to this chapter, or who willfully renders a false or fraudulent report, is guilty of a misdemeanor, which upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500), nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment
 for not exceeding six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment, for each offense.

(b) The supervisor may refer violations of this chapter to a public prosecutor or the Attorney General for prosecution. Upon agreement of any prosecutors, a court may consider consolidating multiple actions relating to the same violation that occurred in different jurisdictions.

(c) As used in this article, “public prosecutor” means a district attorney, a city attorney, a county counsel, or any other city or county prosecutor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 337, Sec. 4.   (AB 631)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3236.2.

(a) (1) Upon referral by the supervisor, a person who violates this chapter or a regulation implementing this chapter is subject to a civil penalty of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each separate violation or, for continuing violations, for each day that violation continues, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2). An act of God or a criminal act of vandalism beyond the reasonable control of the operator is not a violation.

(2) A civil penalty under this subdivision shall not be more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each separate violation, or, for continuing violations, for each day that violation
 continues, if the person accused of the violation alleges by affirmative defense and establishes by a preponderance of the evidence both of the following:

(A) The violation did not result in harm to, and did not present a significant threat to, human health, property, or the environment.
